Florida, session 2026, HB1107.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 790.253, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
790.253 Firearm hold agreements; immunity from liability.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Federal firearms licensee" means a person licensed
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. chapter 44.
(b) "Firearm hold agreement" means a private transaction
between a federal firearms licensee and an individual firearm
owner in which the licensee either provides locked storage in
his or her facility to which only the firearm owner has access
or takes physical possession of the owner's lawfully possessed
firearm at the owner's request, holds the firearm for an agreed-
upon period of time, and returns the firearm to the owner
according to the terms of the transaction.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1107-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1107 2026
(2) A federal firearms licensee is immune from civil
liability while operating lawfully in this state for any act or
omission arising from a firearm hold agreement which results in
the personal injury or death of any individual, including the
return of any firearm to the individual firearm owner by a
federal firearms licensee at the termination of a firearm hold
agreement.
(3) The immunity from civil liability under subsection (2)
does not apply to any action arising from a firearm hold
agreement if such action was the result of otherwise unlawful
conduct on the part of the federal firearms licensee.
(4) This section does not apply to a firearm transfer
pursuant to s. 790.401 or if there is a known existing
protection order governing the respondent under s. 741.30, s.
784.046, or s. 784.0485 or under any other applicable law.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1107-00